Maine, session 132, LD2101.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1225, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Returned payments. If any payment made under this chapter is returned unpaid
for any reason, including but not limited to insufficient funds, account closure,
nonexistence of the account, stop-payment order or any other cause, the commissioner shall
assess a penalty equal to $25 or 1% of the payment amount, whichever is greater.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Allocates funding for bank fees charged for returned payments made under the
Employment Security Law.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $7,000
Page 1 - 132LR2689(03)